Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1103
Active or retired judges; assignment; expenses.

(1) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court may call active judges of the district court to serve on the Court of Appeals in case of incapacity or absence for any reason whatsoever or temporary vacancy in the office of a judge of the Court of Appeals. Any active judge designated to serve on the Court of Appeals shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

(2) The number of retired judges assigned to serve pursuant to subdivision (1) of section 24-729 may not at any one time exceed three, and no panel of the Court of Appeals may contain a majority of retired judges so assigned. Payments to a retired judge shall be made in the manner prescribed in sections 24-730 to 24-733.

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 19.